Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.190

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Final action in writing—Appeal to superior court.

The revocation, suspension or denial of a license, or the issuance of conditional or probationary orders, shall be in writing signed by the director, stating the grounds upon which such order is based and the aggrieved person shall have the right to appeal from such order within fifteen days after a copy thereof is served upon him or her, to the superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the hearing was held. A copy of such findings shall be mailed to the licensee's surety. In such appeal the entire record shall be certified by the director to the court, and the review on appeal shall be confined to the evidence adduced at the hearing before the director.

[ 2011 c 336 s 577; 1959 c 139 s 19.]